Utah statutes.
53A-25b-105.   Applicability of statutes to the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind.

(1)  The Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind is subject to Title 53A, State System of Public Education, and other state laws applicable to public schools, except as otherwise provided by this chapter.

(2)  The following provisions of Title 53A, State System of Public Education, do not apply to the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind:

(a)  provisions governing the budgets, funding, or finances of school districts or charter schools; and

(b)  provisions governing school construction.

(3)  Except as provided in this chapter, the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind is subject to state laws governing state agencies, including:

(a)  Title 51, Chapter 5, Funds Consolidation Act;

(b)  Title 51, Chapter 7, State Money Management Act;

(c)  Title 52, Chapter 4, Open and Public Meetings Act;

(d)  Title 63A, Utah Administrative Services Code;

(e)  Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act;

(f)  Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act;

(g)  Title 63G, Chapter 6, Utah Procurement Code;

(h)  Title 63J, Chapter 1, Budgetary Procedures Act;

(i)  Title 63J, Chapter 2, Revenue Procedures and Control Act; and

(j)  Title 67, Chapter 19, Utah State Personnel Management Act.

